Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.480

Sponsor. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) "Sponsor," for purposes of an electioneering communications, independent expenditures, or political advertising, means the person paying for the electioneering communication, independent expenditure, or political advertising. If a person acts as an agent for another or is reimbursed by another for the payment, the original source of the payment is the sponsor.

(2) "Sponsor," for purposes of a political or incidental committee, means any person, except an authorized committee, to whom any of the following applies:

(a) The committee receives 80 percent or more of its contributions either from the person or from the person's members, officers, employees, or shareholders;

(b) The person collects contributions for the committee by use of payroll deductions or dues from its members, officers, or employees.

[ 2024 c 164 s 248.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.